Connecticut, session 2026, SB00219.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subdivision (1) of subsection (j) of section 47a-21 of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(j) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, the
commissioner may receive and investigate complaints regarding any
alleged violation of [subsections] subsection (b), (d), (h) or (i) of this
section. For the purposes of such investigation, any person who is or
was a landlord shall be subject to the provisions of section 36a-17. If the
commissioner determines that any landlord has violated any provision
of this section over which the commissioner has jurisdiction, the
commissioner may, in accordance with [section] sections 36a-50 and
36a-52, order such [person to] landlord to pay a civil penalty, cease and
desist from such practices and [to] comply with the provisions of this
section.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 47a-21(j)(1)
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 219
BA Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2